test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-63viskama_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - viskama: # Verb (63) '/(eng) to throw /(fin) heittää' - partial paradigm
     viskama+V+Inf/mA: viskama
     viskama+V+Inf: visadaq
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viska
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [viskat, viskadõq]
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viskas
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viskamiq
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viskatiq
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viskasõq
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg: [viska-aiq, viska-ai, viska-iq, viska-i]
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: viskaq
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: viska
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: visada
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [visatat, visatadõq]
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: visatas
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: visatamiq
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: visatatiq
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: visatasõq
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: [visada-aiq, visada-ai, visada-iq, visada-i]
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: visadaq
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: visada

     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [visksi, visassi]
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [visksit, visksiq, visksidõq, visassit, visassiq, visassidõq]
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: visasʼ
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [visksimiq, visassimiq]
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [visksitiq, visassitiq]
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [visksiq, visksivaq, visassiq, visassivaq]
     viskama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: [viska-as, viska-s]
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: visadi
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [visatit, visadiq, visatidõq]
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: visati
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: visatimiq
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: visatitiq
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [visadiq, visativaq]
     viskama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: [visada-as, visada-s]

     viskama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: viskav
     viskama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: viskava
     viskama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: viskavat
     viskama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: viskavahe
     viskama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: viskavaq
     viskama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [viskavidõ, viskaviidõ]
     viskama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [viskavit, viskaviid]
     viskama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [viskavihe, viskaviihe]
                    
     viskama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: visatav
     viskama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: visatava
     viskama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: visatavat
     viskama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: visatavahe
     viskama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: visatavaq
     viskama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [visatavidõ, visataviidõ]
     viskama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [visatavit, visataviid]
     viskama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [visatavihe, visataviihe]

     viskama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: visanuq
     viskama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: visanu
     viskama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: visanut
     viskama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: visanuhe
     viskama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: visanuq
     viskama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [visanuidõ, visanuisi]
     viskama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [visanuid, visanuisi]
     viskama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [visanuihe, visanuisihe]

     viskama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [visat, visatu]
     viskama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: visadu
     viskama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: visatut
     viskama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: visatuhe
     viskama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: visaduq
     viskama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [visatuidõ, visatuisi]
     viskama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [visatuid, visatuisi]
     viskama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [visatuihe, visatuisihe]
